Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-793
Recall petition filing form; filing limitation.

No recall petition filing form shall be filed against a trustee under section 31-787 within twelve months after a recall election has failed to remove him or her from office or within six months after the beginning of his or her term of office or within six months prior to the incumbent filing deadline for the office.

Laws 1997, LB 874, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 28.